Washington statutes.
RCW 32.40.030

Adoption of rules.

The director shall adopt all rules necessary to implement RCW 32.40.010 and 32.40.020 by January 1, 1986.

[ 1994 c 92 s 412; 1985 c 329 s 10.]

NOTES:

Legislative intent—1985 c 329: See note following RCW 30A.60.010.